Utah statutes.
31A-31-109.   Civil penalties.
(1)  In addition to other penalties provided by law, a person who violates
this chapter:
(a)  is subject to the following civil penalties:
(i)  the person shall make full restitution; and
(ii)  the person shall pay the costs of enforcement of this chapter for the
case in which the person is found to have violated this chapter:
(A)  as determined by the one or more authorized agencies involved; and
(B)  including costs of:
(I)  investigators;
(II)  attorneys; and
(III)  other public employees; and
(b)  in the discretion of the court, may be required to pay to the state a
civil penalty not to exceed three times that amount of value improperly sought
or received from the fraudulent insurance act.
(2) (a)  Monies paid under Subsection (1)(a)(i) shall be paid to the person
damaged by the fraudulent insurance act.
(b)  Monies paid under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall be paid to each applicable
authorized agency in the following order:
(i)  to the General Fund as a dedicated credit of the department for the costs
of enforcement incurred by the department;
(ii)  to the General Fund for the costs of enforcement incurred by a state
agency other than the department;
(iii)  to the applicable political subdivision for the costs of enforcement
incurred by the political subdivision; and
(iv)  to the applicable criminal investigative department or agency of the
United States for the costs of enforcement incurred by the department or
agency.
(c)  Monies paid under Subsection (1)(b) shall be paid into the General Fund.
(d)  Monies received by the department under this Subsection (2) are
nonlapsing in accordance with Subsection 31A-31-108(3).
(3) (a)  A civil penalty assessed under Subsection (1) shall be awarded by the
court as part of its judgment in both criminal and civil actions.
(b)  A criminal action need not be brought against a person in order for that
person to be civilly liable under this section.
